Massachusetts, session 194th, H652.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The last paragraph of Section 54B of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following:-   
"With proper and ongoing training, and under the direct supervision of a licensed school 
nurse, the school nurse or school physician may delegate the authority to administer the 
treatment of low blood sugar and monitor symptoms of students with type 1 diabetes to a health 
aide as defined in 105 CMR 210.004 The delivery of parenteral medication, such as the delivery 
of insulin via pump system or syringe, must be administered by a licensed school nurse in 
accordance with 105 CMR 210.00: The administration of prescription medication in public 
schools. Glucose monitoring via finger stick and insulin delivery may be administered in a 
classroom by a trained and licensed school nurse if the student’s family and physician deem the 
administration appropriate.  

of 2 12  Each student with diabetes will be placed in a classroom with a health or instructional 
assistant already supporting other students in this classroom.